Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Penalties

441.990.
Penalties.

A violation of KRS

441.035

shall be deemed a Class A misdemeanor.

No officer or employee of the authority shall have any interest, direct or indirect, in the sale or purchase of any bonds authorized by KRS

441.625

to

441.695

. Violation of this provision shall be punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

2229: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 12, § 13, effective January 1, 1978; 1982, ch. 235, § 21, effective July 15, 1982.